Idaho, session 2025, H0066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 72-713, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-713. NOTICE OF HEARINGS -- SERVICE. (1) The commission shall give
at least ten (10) days' written notice of the time and place of hearing and of
the issues to be heard, either by personal service or by registered or cer-
tified mail. Service by mail shall be deemed complete when a copy of such
notice is deposited in the United States post office, with postage prepaid,
addressed to a party at his last known address, as shown in the records and
files of the commission. Evidence of service by certificate or affidavit of
the person making the same shall be filed with the commission.
(2) Parties represented by an attorney shall receive notice by email.
(3) Unrepresented parties shall receive notice by certified mail.
(4) Unrepresented parties may change their preferred method of service
by providing written notice to the commission and a valid email address for
service.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.